DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTERPOWER DI-351

SUPPLY SYSTEM
DI13U-05
DTC C 1248 / 48 Rear Differential Lock Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
C1248 ) 48 Openor shortcircuitin rear differential lock circuit. * Rear differential lock
Rear differential is locking. « Rear differential lock circuit
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkthereardifferential is free and REARDIFF.LOCK switchis OFF.

LAND CRUISER (W/G)

(RM616E)

NG> Repair the rear differential lock system.




DI-352 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

2 [Is DTC output?

Check DTC on page DI-312.

NO> Normal.

YES

3 | Check that REAR DIFF. LOCK indicator light does not go off.

NO> Go to step 6.

YES

4 | Check that bulb for REAR DIFF. LOCK indicator light is not burnt out.

YES> Replace indicator light.

5 | Check for open circuit in harness and connector between battery and REAR
DIFF. LOCK indicator light, REAR DIFF. LOCK indicator light and ABS ECU (See
page IN-24).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)



DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER DI-353
SUPPLY SYSTEM

6 Check for short circuit in harness and connector between REAR DIFF. LOCK in-
dicator light and ABS ECU (See page IN-24).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace ABS ECU.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)



